Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Editor's notes.

- This article formerly contained a Code Section 12-5-4, which was repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 987,

§

5, effective April 9, 1981. The former Code section pertained to declaration of need for regulation of water related recreational events and was based on Ga. L. 1973, p. 1449,

§§

2-5.

12-5-1. Water Resources Center - Establishment and operation by Georgia Institute of Technology; purposes.

The Georgia Institute of Technology shall establish and operate a center to be known as the Water Resources Center or such other name as may be approved by the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia. Such center will be for the purpose of conducting research, investigations, experiments, and training in relation to water and resources which affect water. The center shall publish in print or electronically and otherwise make available its findings, conclusions, and recommendations arising from the research and projects conducted by such center.

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 252, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.)

12-5-2. Water Resources Center - Receipt of funds and grants.

The center is authorized to make application for and receive from the federal government such funds and grants as shall be made available under the Water Research and Development Act of 1978, 42 U.S.C. Section 7801, et seq., and to utilize and disburse such funds for such purposes and projects as will carry out the purposes of the center. The center is also authorized to utilize such moneys as may be made available to it for this purpose as matching funds to federal moneys for necessary expenses of specific water resources research projects which could not be otherwise undertaken under normal grants from the federal government.

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 252, § 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a comma was inserted in the United States Code reference in the first sentence.

12-5-3. Water Resources Center - Power to enter into contracts, agreements, and participation arrangements.

The center is authorized to enter into contracts, agreements, and arrangements with other colleges and universities for participation in the work of the center. The center shall also be authorized to enter into contracts and agreements with the federal government, with political subdivisions of this state, with private firms, foundations, or institutions, or with individuals for specific research into any aspects of water problems as may be related to the purposes of this article.

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 252, § 3.)

12-5-4. Programs for voluntary water conservation and enhancing water supply.

As used in this Code section, the term "agency" or "agencies" means the Department of Natural Resources, including its Environmental Protection Division, the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority, the Department of Community Affairs, the State Forestry Commission, the Department of Community Health, the Department of Public Health, the Department of Agriculture, and the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission individually or collectively as the text requires.

On or before August 1, 2010, the agencies shall examine their practices, programs, policies, rules, and regulations to identify opportunities to provide enhanced programming and incentives for voluntary water conservation. The agencies shall, without limitation, identify and provide for rules, regulations, incentives, or opportunities to:

Include water conservation measures in the comprehensive plans submitted to the Department of Community Affairs by local governments;

Provide technical assistance to local governments and public water systems for water loss abatement activities;

Support state-wide water campaigns and public outreach programs, such as Conserve Georgia and WaterFirst programs;

Encourage residential and commercial retrofits for water efficient fixtures and equipment;

Encourage residential and commercial retrofits for water efficient landscaping irrigation systems;

Encourage the installation of landscapes in commercial and residential settings utilizing landscape best management practices that include soil preparation, plant selection, and water use efficiency;

Encourage the use of rain water and gray water, where appropriate, in lieu of potable water;

Encourage the installation of submeters on existing nonsubmetered multifamily complexes and multiunit commercial and industrial complexes;

Encourage public water systems to develop and improve water loss abatement programs;

Encourage public water systems to implement the industry's best management practices for controlling water loss and achieve the recommended standards;

Provide incentives for residential and commercial water conservation pricing by public water systems;

Provide incentives for public water systems to use full cost accounting;

Encourage voluntary inclusion of water conservation guidelines in applications for new ground-water withdrawal permits and surface-water withdrawal permits; and

Examine the effect that water conservation has on water rates and consider policies to mitigate the financial impact that rate increases or reductions in water use have on water utilities and water users.

On or before August 1, 2010, the agencies shall examine their practices, programs, policies, rules, and regulations to identify opportunities to enhance the state's water supply. The agencies shall, without limitation, identify opportunities to:

Obtain funding; and

Conduct feasibility studies on reservoir dredging and water management measures that could enhance water supply when funding is available.

Each agency shall coordinate with the Department of Natural Resources to:

Establish administrative programs and procedures to encourage water conservation and to enhance the state's water supply consistent with the results of the reviews required under subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section;

Submit an interim report of the reviews required under subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and Speaker of the House on or before July 1, 2010, which shall include, at a minimum, the programmatic changes and proposed changes being implemented to encourage water conservation and to enhance the state's water supply;

Submit a final report of the review required under subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section to the General Assembly by August 1, 2010, which report shall include at a minimum an outline and narrative summary of the rules, regulations, and policies that have been adopted to encourage water conservation and to enhance the state's water supply; and

Submit a report to the General Assembly on or before January 1 of 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, and 2015 including an outline and narrative summary of the programmatic changes encouraging water conservation and to enhance the state's water supply that were implemented during the immediately preceding calendar year, outlining the agency's goals for the next calendar year, and identifying the rules, regulations, and policies that were adopted to support those programmatic changes.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 732, § 2/SB 370; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 12/HB 142.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, "the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority" was substituted for "the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority" near the middle of subsection (a), and an extra "the" was deleted preceding "programmatic changes" in paragraph (d)(4).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2010, p. 732,

§

1/SB 370, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The General Assembly recognizes the imminent need to create a culture of water conservation in the State of Georgia. The General Assembly also recognizes the imminent need to plan for water supply enhancement during future extreme drought conditions and other water emergencies. In order to achieve these goals, the General Assembly directs the Georgia Department of Natural Resources to coordinate with its Environmental Protection Division, the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority [now known as the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority], the Georgia Department of Community Affairs, the Georgia Forestry Commission, the Georgia Department of Community Health, including its Division of Public Health, the Georgia Department of Agriculture, and the Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Commission to work together as appropriate to develop programs for water conservation and water supply."

This Code section formerly pertained to rules and regulations relating to water conservation plans. The former Code section was based on Code 1981,

§

12-5-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 863,

§

1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6,

§

12, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644,

§

4-1/SB 342, effective May 13, 2008.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Rules for Public Water Systems to Improve Water Supply Efficiency, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-33.

Law reviews.

-
For article on 2010 amendment of this Code section, "Conservation and Natural Resources," see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 185 (2010). For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

12-5-4.1. Adoption of minimum standards and best practices for improving efficiency and effectiveness of water use; requirements.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Public water system" means a system for the provision to the public of piped water for human consumption, if such system regularly serves at least 3,300 individuals. Such term includes but is not limited to any collection, treatment, storage, and distribution facilities under the control of the operator of such system and used primarily in connection with such system and any collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under such control which are used primarily in connection with such system.

The Board of Natural Resources shall by January 1, 2011, adopt rules for the minimum standards and best practices for monitoring and improving the efficiency and effectiveness of water use by public water systems to improve water conservation. The best practices program shall include without limitation:

The establishment of an infrastructure leakage index;

The establishment of categories of public water systems based on geographical size and service population;

A phased-in approach requiring public water systems to conduct standardized annual water loss audits according to the International Water Association water audit method/standard and to submit those audits to the division;

A phased-in approach requiring public water systems to implement water loss detection programs; and

The development of a technical assistance program to provide guidance to public water systems for water loss detection programs, to include without limitation metering techniques, utilization of portable and permanent water loss detection devices, and funding when available.

By January 1, 2012, public water systems serving at least 10,000 individuals shall have conducted a water loss audit pursuant to the minimum standards and best practices adopted by the Board of Natural Resources. By January 1, 2013, all other public water systems shall have conducted a water loss audit pursuant to the minimum standards and best practices adopted by the Board of Natural Resources. Audit results shall be submitted to the division within 60 days of completion and shall be posted on the division's website in a timely manner after receipt by the division.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 732, § 3/SB 370.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2010, p. 732,

§

1/SB 370, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The General Assembly recognizes the imminent need to create a culture of water conservation in the State of Georgia. The General Assembly also recognizes the imminent need to plan for water supply enhancement during future extreme drought conditions and other water emergencies. In order to achieve these goals, the General Assembly directs the Georgia Department of Natural Resources to coordinate with its Environmental Protection Division, the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority [now known as the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority], the Georgia Department of Community Affairs, the Georgia Forestry Commission, the Georgia Department of Community Health, including its Division of Public Health, the Georgia Department of Agriculture, and the Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Commission to work together as appropriate to develop programs for water conservation and water supply."

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Rules for Public Water Systems to Improve Water Supply Efficiency, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-33.

Law reviews.

-
For article on 2010 amendment of this Code section, see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 185 (2010).

12-5-5. Local water authorities allowed to establish program for voluntary contributions to conservation and environmental projects.

Any local water authority created pursuant to an Act of the General Assembly shall have the authority to solicit and receive from its customers voluntary donations to be used for such programs and projects as the authority may designate designed to protect and improve the quality of the waters of the state. Each such authority shall have the authority to establish and operate one or more such programs or projects.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 892, § 1.)

12-5-6. Installation and definition of "rain sensor shut-off switch"; penalty for violations.

As used in this Code section, the term "rain sensor shut-off switch" means an electric device that detects and measures rainfall amounts and overrides the cycle of an irrigation system so as to turn off such system when a predetermined amount of rain has fallen.

On and after January 1, 2005, no person shall install within the Metropolitan North Georgia Water Planning District area created under Article 10 of this chapter any landscape irrigation system equipped with an electronic controller that does not have a rain sensor shut-off switch.

Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to either landscape irrigation systems installed on golf courses or any system dependent upon a nonpublic water source.

Any person who installs a landscape irrigation system equipped with an electronic controller in violation of this Code section shall be liable for a civil penalty not exceeding $100.00 per violation.

The magistrate and municipal courts shall have jurisdiction in such cases.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 756, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 12/SB 465.)

12-5-7. Local variances from state restrictions on outdoor watering; limitations on outdoor irrigation; exceptions.

Any political subdivision of this state or local government authority may, upon application to and approval by the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the department for good cause shown, impose more stringent restrictions on outdoor water use during nondrought periods or state declared periods of drought than those applicable restrictions, if any, imposed by the state during such periods. For purposes of this subsection, "good cause" means evidence sufficient to support a reasonable conclusion, considering available relevant information, that such additional restrictions are necessary and appropriate to avoid or relieve a local water shortage. A variance granted pursuant to this subsection shall be valid for such period as determined by the director.

Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not prohibit a political subdivision or local government authority from imposing more stringent restrictions on outdoor water use in case of an emergency which immediately threatens the public health, safety, or welfare; provided, however, that such emergency restrictions shall be valid for a period not exceeding seven days unless a variance is granted by the director pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. If the director determines that a political subdivision or local government authority is exercising emergency powers granted by this paragraph in a manner to circumvent the necessity of obtaining such a variance, he or she may suspend the emergency powers granted by this paragraph to such political subdivision or local government authority.

In the event that a political subdivision of this state or local government authority is unable to satisfy reduced water consumption or other permit requirements under its water withdrawal or operating permit due to its inability under this subsection to impose more stringent restrictions on outdoor water use during periods of drought than those applicable restrictions, if any, imposed by the state, such political subdivision or local government authority shall be exempt from fines, sanctions, or other penalties applicable for such failure upon the approval of the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the department. The director shall consider all measures implemented by such political subdivision or local government authority prior to issuing fines, sanctions, or other penalties applicable, if any, for such failure. The political subdivision or local government authority shall notify the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the department within ten business days following the discovery of such failure. The director may request additional information at any time to substantiate such a claim.

The director of the Environmental Protection Division may revoke, suspend, or modify, upon not less than three days' written notice, a political subdivision's or local government authority's water withdrawal or waste treatment permit issued pursuant to this chapter consistent with the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of this state for violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection or any variance granted pursuant thereto.

(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not create any limitation upon the following outdoor water uses:

Commercial agricultural operations as defined in Code Section 1-3-3;

Capture and reuse of cooling system condensate or storm water in compliance with applicable local ordinances and state guidelines;

Reuse of gray water in compliance with Code Section 31-3-5.2 and applicable local board of health regulations adopted pursuant thereto;

Use of reclaimed waste water by a designated user from a system permitted by the Environmental Protection Division of the department to provide reclaimed waste water;

Irrigation of personal food gardens;

Irrigation of new and replanted plant, seed, or turf in landscapes, golf courses, or sports turf fields during installation and for a period of 30 days immediately following the date of installation;

Drip irrigation or irrigation using soaker hoses;

Handwatering with a hose with automatic cutoff or handheld container;

Use of water withdrawn from private water wells or surface water by an owner or operator of property if such well or surface water is on said property;

Irrigation of horticultural crops held for sale, resale, or installation;

Irrigation of athletic fields, golf courses, or public turf grass recreational areas;

Installation, maintenance, or calibration of irrigation systems; or

Hydroseeding.

(3) Governing authorities of counties and municipalities shall adopt the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection by ordinance, to become effective not later than January 1, 2011, and violations of such adopted provisions shall be punished as ordinance violations.

(a.1) (1)
Persons may irrigate outdoors daily for purposes of planting, growing, managing, or maintaining ground cover, trees, shrubs, or other plants only between the hours of 4:00 P.M. and 10:00 A.M.

Any political subdivision of this state or local government authority may apply for and, upon approval by the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the department for good cause shown, shall be granted an exemption from nonstatutory outdoor watering restrictions or water use reductions imposed by the state. For purposes of this subsection, "good cause" means evidence sufficient to support a reasonable conclusion, considering available relevant information, that such restrictions, reductions, or both are not necessary and appropriate to avoid or relieve a local water shortage. A variance granted pursuant to this subsection shall be valid for such period as determined by the director.

The director shall render a decision on an application made by a political subdivision or local government authority under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section within five business days after receipt thereof.

Any permittee who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the director of the Environmental Protection Division pursuant to this Code section shall have a right to a hearing pursuant to the provisions of Code Section

12-2-2

.

Notwithstanding the stay provisions of subparagraph (c)(2)(B) of Code Section

12-2-2

, the filing of a petition for a hearing before an administrative law judge from an action taken pursuant to this Code section stays the order of the director of the Environmental Protection Division for not more than five days and such stay shall automatically be lifted without further action by the director if the petition has not been ruled upon by the end of the fifth day following filing of the petition; provided, however, that the petitioner's right to a hearing remains in full force and effect.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 814, § 1/HB 1281; Ga. L. 2010, p. 732, § 4/SB 370; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 12/HB 142.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2008, p. 814,

§

1/HB 1281, provided for the repeal of this Code section effective July 1, 2010.
Ga. L. 2010, p. 732,

§

4/SB 370, amended this Code section to eliminate the repealing provisions.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 732,

§

1/SB 370, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The General Assembly recognizes the imminent need to create a culture of water conservation in the State of Georgia. The General Assembly also recognizes the imminent need to plan for water supply enhancement during future extreme drought conditions and other water emergencies. In order to achieve these goals, the General Assembly directs the Georgia Department of Natural Resources to coordinate with its Environmental Protection Division, the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority [now known as the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority], the Georgia Department of Community Affairs, the Georgia Forestry Commission, the Georgia Department of Community Health, including its Division of Public Health, the Georgia Department of Agriculture, and the Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Commission to work together as appropriate to develop programs for water conservation and water supply."

Law reviews.

-
For article on 2010 amendment of this Code section, see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 185 (2010).

12-5-8. Rules and regulations relating to drought management.

Not later than June 30, 2009, the board shall adopt new rules and regulations relating to drought management consistent with this chapter and any state-wide water management plan under Article 8 of this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall include but not be limited to provisions for a drought response committee; drought indicators and triggers; a drought declaration process; and state and local predrought mitigation strategies and drought response strategies. Such predrought mitigation strategies shall be designed to minimize the potential effects of drought. Such drought response strategies shall be measures or actions to be implemented during various stages of drought. Such rules and regulations shall replace any previous drought management plan adopted by the board and shall be revised from time to time as the board deems appropriate.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 814, § 1/HB 1281.)

12-5-9. Georgia Geospatial Advisory Council.

Repealed by Ga. L.
2014, p. 402, § 1/SB 361, effective June 30, 2017.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Ga. L. 2014, p. 402,

§

1/SB 361.